Hawaii statutes.
§8-1 Holidays designated. The
following days of each year are set apart and established as state holidays:

The first day in January, New Year's Day;

The third Monday in January, Dr. Martin Luther
King, Jr., Day;

The third Monday in February, Presidents' Day;

The twenty-sixth day in March, Prince Jonah
Kuhio Kalanianaole Day;

The Friday preceding Easter Sunday, Good
Friday;

The last Monday in May, Memorial Day;

The eleventh day in June, King Kamehameha I
Day;

The fourth day in July, Independence Day;

The third Friday in August, Statehood Day;

The first Monday in September, Labor Day;

The eleventh day in November, Veterans' Day;

The fourth Thursday in November, Thanksgiving
Day;

The twenty-fifth day in December, Christmas
Day;

All election days, except primary and special
election days, in the county wherein the election is held;

Any day designated by proclamation by the
President of the United States or by the governor as a holiday. [L 1896, c 66,
§1; am L 1903, c 55, §1; am L 1911, c 167, §1; am L 1915, c 20, §1; am L 1919,
c 54, §1; RL 1925, pt of §146; RL 1935, pt of §21; am L 1941, c 132, pt of §1;
RL 1945, pt of §21; am L 1945, JR 8, §1; am L 1949, JR 15, §1; am L 1953, c
278, pt of §10; am L 1955, c 9, §1; RL 1955, pt of §1-43; am L 1961, c 116, pt
of §1; am L 1965, c 162, §1; HRS §8-1; am L 1969, c 156, §1; am L 1971, c 21,
§2; am L 1976, c 220, §2; am L 1978, c 205, §2; am L 1980, c 11, §1; am L 1988,
c 220, §1; am L 2001, c 65, §1]

Cross References

Computation of time, see §1-29.

Rules of Court

Computation of time, see DCRCP rule 6; HCTR rule 21; HFCR
rule 6; HPR rule 10; HRAP rule 26(a); HRCP rule 6(a); HRPP rule 45(a).

Attorney General Opinions

When federal holiday is state holiday. Att. Gen. Op. 85-9.

Case Notes

See also note to §1-29.

Provision declaring Good Friday as state holiday does not
violate First Amendment establishment clause of U.S. Constitution. 932 F.2d
765.

Cited: 17 H. 19, 22.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next